Wisconsin, session 2025, SB942.
do enact as follows:SB942,11Section 1. 71.07 (8b) (a) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,2,5271.07 (8b) (a) 7. “Qualified development” means a qualified low-income 3housing project under section 42 (g) of the Internal Revenue Code that is financed 4with tax-exempt bonds, pursuant to section 42 (i) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 5and located in this state.SB942,26Section 2. 71.07 (8b) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,3,8771.07 (8b) (c) 2. A partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option 8corporation may not claim the credit under this subsection. The partners of a 9partnership, members of a limited liability company, or shareholders in a tax-option 10corporation may claim the credit under this subsection based on eligible costs 11incurred by the partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation. 12The partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall calculate 13the amount of the credit that may be claimed by each partner, member, or 14shareholder and shall provide that information to the partner, member, or 15shareholder. For shareholders of a tax-option corporation, the credit may be 16allocated in proportion to the ownership interest of each shareholder. Credits 17computed by a partnership or limited liability company may be claimed in 18proportion to the ownership interests of the partners or members or allocated to 1partners or members as provided in a written agreement among the partners or 2members that is entered into no later than the last day of the taxable year of the 3partnership or limited liability company, for which the credit is claimed. Any 4partner or member who claims the credit as allocated by a written agreement shall 5provide a copy of the agreement with the tax return on which the credit is claimed. 6A Except as provided in s. 71.745, a person claiming the credit as provided under 7this subdivision is solely responsible for any tax liability arising from a dispute with 8the department of revenue related to claiming the credit.SB942,39Section 3. 71.28 (8b) (a) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,3,131071.28 (8b) (a) 7. “Qualified development” means a qualified low-income 11housing project under section 42 (g) of the Internal Revenue Code that is financed 12with tax-exempt bonds, pursuant to section 42 (i) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13and located in this state.SB942,414Section 4. 71.28 (8b) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,4,101571.28 (8b) (c) 2. A partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option 16corporation may not claim the credit under this subsection. The partners of a 17partnership, members of a limited liability company, or shareholders in a tax-option 18corporation may claim the credit under this subsection based on eligible costs 19incurred by the partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation. 20The partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall calculate 21the amount of the credit that may be claimed by each partner, member, or 22shareholder and shall provide that information to the partner, member, or 23shareholder. For shareholders of a tax-option corporation, the credit may be 24allocated in proportion to the ownership interest of each shareholder. Credits 1computed by a partnership or limited liability company may be claimed in 2proportion to the ownership interests of the partners or members or allocated to 3partners or members as provided in a written agreement among the partners or 4members that is entered into no later than the last day of the taxable year of the 5partnership or limited liability company, for which the credit is claimed. Any 6partner or member who claims the credit as allocated by a written agreement shall 7provide a copy of the agreement with the tax return on which the credit is claimed. 8A Except as provided in s. 71.745, a person claiming the credit as provided under 9this subdivision is solely responsible for any tax liability arising from a dispute with 10the department of revenue related to claiming the credit.SB942,511Section 5. 71.47 (8b) (a) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,4,151271.47 (8b) (a) 7. “Qualified development” means a qualified low-income 13housing project under section 42 (g) of the Internal Revenue Code that is financed 14with tax-exempt bonds, pursuant to section 42 (i) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 15and located in this state.SB942,616Section 6. 71.47 (8b) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,5,121771.47 (8b) (c) 2. A partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option 18corporation may not claim the credit under this subsection. The partners of a 19partnership, members of a limited liability company, or shareholders in a tax-option 20corporation may claim the credit under this subsection based on eligible costs 21incurred by the partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation. 22The partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall calculate 23the amount of the credit that may be claimed by each partner, member, or 24shareholder and shall provide that information to the partner, member, or 1shareholder. For shareholders of a tax-option corporation, the credit may be 2allocated in proportion to the ownership interest of each shareholder. Credits 3computed by a partnership or limited liability company may be claimed in 4proportion to the ownership interests of the partners or members or allocated to 5partners or members as provided in a written agreement among the partners or 6members that is entered into no later than the last day of the taxable year of the 7partnership or limited liability company, for which the credit is claimed. Any 8partner or member who claims the credit as allocated by a written agreement shall 9provide a copy of the agreement with the tax return on which the credit is claimed. 10A Except as provided in s. 71.745, a person claiming the credit as provided under 11this subdivision is solely responsible for any tax liability arising from a dispute with 12the department of revenue related to claiming the credit.SB942,713Section 7. 76.639 (1) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,5,171476.639 (1) (g) “Qualified development” means a qualified low-income housing 15project under section 42 (g) of the Internal Revenue Code that is financed with tax-16exempt bonds, pursuant to section 42 (i) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code, and 17located in this state.SB942,818Section 8. 76.639 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 76.639 (3) (a).SB942,919Section 9. 76.639 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB942,6,122076.639 (3) (b) A partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option 21corporation may not claim the credit under this section. An insurer, if a partner of 22a partnership, member of a limited liability company, or shareholder in a tax-option 23corporation, may claim the credit under this section based on eligible costs incurred 24by the partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation. The 1partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall calculate the 2amount of the credit that may be claimed by the insurer as a partner, member, or 3shareholder and shall provide that information to the insurer. If an insurer is a 4shareholder of a tax-option corporation, the credit may be allocated in proportion to 5its ownership interest as a shareholder. If an insurer is a partner of a partnership 6or member of a limited liability company, credits may be claimed in proportion to 7the insurer’s ownership interest or allocated to the insurer as provided in a written 8agreement among the partners or members that is entered into no later than the 9last day of the taxable year of the partnership or limited liability company for which 10the credit is claimed. Any insurer who claims the credit as allocated by a written 11agreement shall provide a copy of the agreement with the tax return on which the 12credit is claimed.SB942,1013Section 10. 76.67 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,7,21476.67 (2) If any domestic insurer is licensed to transact insurance business in 15another state, this state may not require similar insurers domiciled in that other 16state to pay taxes greater in the aggregate than the aggregate amount of taxes that 17a domestic insurer is required to pay to that other state for the same year less the 18credits under ss. 76.635, 76.636, 76.637, 76.638, 76.639, and 76.655, except that the 19amount imposed shall not be less than the total of the amounts due under ss. 76.65 20(2) and 601.93 and, if the insurer is subject to s. 76.60, 0.375 percent of its gross 21premiums, as calculated under s. 76.62, less offsets allowed under s. 646.51 (7) or 22under ss. 76.635, 76.636, 76.637, 76.638, 76.639, and 76.655 against that total, and 1except that the amount imposed shall not be less than the amount due under s. 2601.93.SB942,113Section 11. 234.45 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,7,74234.45 (1) (e) “Qualified development” means a qualified low-income housing 5project under section 42 (g) of the Internal Revenue Code that is financed with tax-6exempt bonds, pursuant to section 42 (i) (2) of the Internal Revenue Code, and 7located in this state.SB942,128Section 12. 234.45 (1) (em) of the statutes is created to read:SB942,7,119234.45 (1) (em) “Rural area” means a city, village, or town in this state that 10has a population of fewer than 10,000 and that is at least 10 miles from any city, 11village, or town that has a population of at least 50,000.SB942,1312Section 13. 234.45 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB942,7,2013234.45 (4) Allocation limits. In any calendar year, the aggregate amount of 14all state tax credits for which the authority certifies persons in allocation 15certificates issued under sub. (3) in that year may not exceed $42,000,000 16$100,000,000, including all amounts each person is eligible to claim for each year of 17the credit period, plus the total amount of all unallocated state tax credits from 18previous calendar years and plus the total amount of all previously allocated state 19tax credits that have been revoked or cancelled or otherwise recovered by the 20authority.SB942,1421Section 14. 234.45 (5m) of the statutes is created to read:SB942,8,222234.45 (5m) Preference for rural communities. (a) In each qualified 23allocation plan adopted by the authority after the effective date of this paragraph 24.... [LRB inserts date], the authority shall ensure that at least 35 percent of the 1value of all state tax credits the authority allocates each year pursuant to the 2qualified allocation plan are for qualified developments located in rural areas.SB942,8,83(b) Paragraph (a) does not apply in any year in which the authority cannot 4satisfy the 35 percent allocation threshold because the authority does not receive a 5sufficient number of applications for allocation certificates for qualified 6developments located in rural areas that have timely submitted complete 7applications that meet all threshold requirements of the applicable qualified 8allocation plan as determined by the authority.SB942,159Section 15. Initial applicability.SB942,8,1110(1) The treatment of ss. 71.07 (8b) (a) 7., 71.28 (8b) (a) 7., 71.47 (8b) (a) 7., and 1176.639 (1) (g) first applies to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.SB942,8,1212